Utah statutes.
58-77-304.   Parents' rights.

Nothing in this chapter abridges, limits, or changes in any way the right of parents to deliver their baby where, when, how, and with whom they choose, regardless of licensure under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 299, 2005 General Session

